Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-1304 — 10-3-1319. [Reserved.]

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall be composed of ten (10) members appointed pursuant to the Rules of the Senate and shall function in the interim between the sine die adjournment or extended recess of the regular session or fiscal session of each General Assembly until the convening of the next regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly or the convening of the current General Assembly during an extended recess.

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall make continuing studies pertaining to the safety, health, development, and problems of children. The studies may either be initiated by the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or referred to it by either house of the General Assembly for study in the interim between sessions of the General Assembly. Interim study proposals and resolutions relating to children, which are filed with the Legislative Council under the provisions of § 10-3-214 for review and referral to the appropriate germane joint interim committee of the General Assembly, shall be referred to the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth. The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall undertake each study referred to it by members of the General Assembly or by the Legislative Council and shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations in regard to each study request prior to the convening of the next session of the General Assembly.

In addition, the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall exercise leadership in the interim between legislative sessions and shall attempt to coordinate for the various committees of the General Assembly the various activities, studies, and planning activities of the General Assembly which relate to children and youth, delivery of services to children, and use of funding resources for programs and services.

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall cooperate with the Governor, the appropriate administrative agencies of this state, legislative and administrative agencies of other states, and the federal government, including participation in regional and national meetings and seminars of state and federal officials in the exchange of information and data on children and youth problems and resolution of those problems.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “session or fiscal” following “regular” twice in (a); and deleted “regular” following “convening of the next” near the end of the last sentence of (b).

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§10-3-1301 —10-3-1303 and10-3-1320 —10-3-1322 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 160, § 2: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that this act modifies the composition of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy; that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not become effective until ninety days after the adjournment of this regular session; that the committee will likely have business to conduct prior to the expiration of that ninety-day period; and that there is a necessity for continuity of committee membership during the interim between sessions. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1981, § 4: Apr. 11, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the State of Arkansas has been disadvantaged in its ability to effectively compete for large economic development projects due to its inability to quickly raise revenues through the issuance of general obligation bonds; that attracting a project would significantly benefit the economic development of the state by providing increased payrolls, job opportunities, and tax income; that the citizens of the State of Arkansas recognized the missed opportunities caused by this competitive disadvantage through their overwhelming approval of Amendment 82; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to effectuate the will of the people and position the State of Arkansas to act expeditiously in securing a project in the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 823, § 2: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act concerns the forecast of general revenues, which is essential to finance the operations of state government; and that a delay in the effective date of this act beyond the start of the next fiscal year on July 1, 2017, could work irreparable harm to the proper administration and provision of essential government programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “annual” for “biennial” in (b).

Review the biennial and annual revenue forecast submitted by the executive branch;

Provide legislators with such information as may be requested regarding the data and assumptions supporting the forecast;

At the request of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy, provide alternative forecasts based on different assumptions regarding economic performance;

Make periodic reviews of the official revenue forecast performance;

Provide members with analyses of policy proposals which might affect the economy or fiscal outlook of the State of Arkansas;

Biennially prepare and make available to the members of the General Assembly a comprehensive compilation of taxes levied by the State of Arkansas;

Provide members of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy or other members of the General Assembly with such data, information, or policy studies as may be requested, subject to time and resource constraints;

Review any changes made in the distribution of funds for public education; and

Perform or arrange for the performance of audits of the economic impact and cost-benefit with regard to any economic development project for which the sponsor receives the benefit of Amendment 82 bond financing.

The official forecast for the upcoming fiscal year, including any revisions necessitated by the revised forecast required under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section; and

A revised forecast for the current fiscal year.

(A)The Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy may hold meetings and hearings and request such information, data, or studies as it deems necessary.

Upon hearing evidence and information regarding the outlook for state revenues, the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy shall make its findings on the forecasts of general revenues available for distribution.

A report of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy's findings shall be sent to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(1); in (a)(2)(B), deleted “the members of” preceding “the Joint Committee” and substituted “forecasts” for “forecast”; and, in (b), substituted “If” for “In the event” and “change either forecast” for “change the forecast.”

The 2017 amendment substituted “third Wednesday” for “first Wednesday” in (a)(1).

If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State determines it has become necessary to change either forecast of general revenues available for distribution, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall report the expected change in forecast to the Office of Economic and Tax Policy and the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy with an explanation of the need for the change.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall cooperate with and assist the Office of Economic and Tax Policy in carrying out its responsibilities by providing:

(1)Other state agencies shall cooperate with and assist the office in carrying out its duties, including, without limitation:

Review and analysis of cost-benefit studies;

Fiscal impact statements; and

Other fiscal analyses as requested by the office.

State agencies shall provide assistance to the office as requested.

The state-supported institutions of higher education shall:

(1)The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall cooperate with and assist the office in carrying out its responsibilities by providing:

The office with information requested by the office; and

Assistance to the office as requested.

The division shall provide the office with any information regarding changes in the calculation of state aid to public school districts within seven (7) working days of a change.

The Arkansas Economic Development Commission and the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall cooperate with and assist the office in carrying out its responsibilities by providing:

The office with information requested by the office; and

Assistance to the office as requested.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in the introductory language of (d)(1) and in (d)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 7: Nov. 16, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas has recently expended huge amounts of state revenues for costs involved in desegregation litigation; that it is in the best interests of all taxpayers of this state that an oversight subcommittee representative of the interests of the state be established to advise the Governor and the General Assembly in settlements of litigation involving desegregation and to develop positive means to avoid future litigation in the area; that the establishment of this subcommittee through legislation is necessitated by a recent opinion issued by the Attorney General. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 112, § 40: Feb. 7, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Education and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Education; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Education and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on education; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effect on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden it shall become effective on the date the last the house overrides the veto.”

A.C.R.C. Notes. In November, 1982, the Little Rock School District filed suit against the Pulaski County Special School District, the North Little Rock School District, the State of Arkansas, and the State Board of Education alleging actions by officials resulting in the segregation of schools in the Little Rock district. Little Rock School District v. Pulaski County School District No. 1, et. al., Docket No. LR-C-82-866. In December, 1989, the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Arkansas, Henry Woods, J., rejected the settlement plan submitted (726 F. Supp. 1544 (E.D. Ark. 1989)). The court of appeals reversed, holding the settlement plan should have been approved (921 F.2d 1371 (8th Cir. 1990)). On remand (769 F. Supp. 1483 (E.D. Ark. 1991)) the agreement was again rejected and the appeal therefrom vacated (949 F.2d 253 (8th Cir. Ark. 1991)).

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the establishment of the Desegregation Litigation Oversight Subcommittee, expired by its own terms September 30, 2017. The section was derived from Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 6; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the membership of the Desegregation Litigation Oversight Subcommittee, expired by its own terms September 30, 2017. The section was derived from Acts 1989, (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 2; 1997, No. 112, § 26; 1997, No. 250, § 56; 1997, No. 1354, § 26; 1999, No. 1508, § 7; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 7; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the reduction of future litigation liability, expired by its own terms September 30, 2017. The section was derived from Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 4; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 8; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 8.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reports and settlements, expired by its own terms September 30, 2017. The section was derived fromActs 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 3; 1997, No. 112, § 27; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 9; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 9.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning comprehensive study, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1465, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 1940, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the establishment, members, and duties of the Arkansas Public School Desegregation Lawsuit Resolution Task Force, was repealed by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, §10. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 2286, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 517, § 3; 1997, No. 312, § 11; 2009, No. 962, § 23.

10-3-1321. Meetings — Intergovernmental cooperation.

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall meet upon call by the Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth, or at such other times as may be provided in the rules of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth, or upon written call by any five (5) of its members.

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall cooperate with the Council of State Governments, the Southern Legislative Conference, the National Conference of State Legislatures and its committees, and other appropriate conferences or associations of public officials concerned with the problems of children and youth for the purpose of coordinating the activities and resources of the legislative departments of the sister states to assist the Congress of the United States and the federal government in coordinating state and regional programs for the safety, health, development, and problems of children and youth.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 517, § 5; 1997, No. 312, § 12.

10-3-1322. Reimbursement of expenses — Staff assistance.

(1)Members of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall be entitled to per diem and mileage for attending each meeting of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or in attending to authorized business of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth business at the same rate as provided by law for members of the General Assembly for attending meetings of the interim committees of the General Assembly.

The per diem and mileage, including reimbursement for expenses for attending out-of-state meetings as provided by law, shall be paid from funds appropriated for per diem, mileage, and expenses for members of the General Assembly for attending interim committee meetings or from other funds provided by law for that purpose.

The Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative Council shall furnish staff assistance as may be requested by the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 517, § 4; 1997, No. 312, § 13; 1997, No. 1354, § 24.

10-3-1323. Compliance with child welfare reform.

The General Assembly finds that the requirements with which the state must comply pursuant to the consent decree from Angela R., et al. v. Bill Clinton, et al. and the Arkansas Child Welfare Reform Document demand close observation and study; that the future of the state's children and youth relies heavily on compliance with the decree; that the financial security of the state is in jeopardy if the state has difficulty or is unable to comply with the consent decree because of the voluminous number of lawsuits that could ensue; that the state has a responsibility to protect children and youth from harm and ensure their healthy development; that the Child Welfare Compliance and Oversight Committee will cease to exist on December 31, 1994; that in order to protect the interests of the state, it is crucial that oversight of child welfare issues continue; that oversight by a committee that focuses specifically on problems relating to children and youth would be the most advantageous manner of monitoring compliance with the consent decree and related problems. Therefore, it is declared to be the intent of the General Assembly to require the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth to monitor compliance with the consent decree, to report annually regarding compliance, and to review all bills pertaining to the safety, health, mental health, development, and problems of children and youth.

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall make a report at least annually regarding the state's compliance with the Arkansas Child Welfare Reform Document and review all bills pertaining to the safety, health, mental health, development, and problems of children and youth. The report shall be made available to all members of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1033, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 312, § 13.

Subchapter 14

— Office of Economic and Tax Policy

10-3-1401. Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy — Creation.

(1)There is hereby created the “Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy” which shall be composed of:

The cochairs of the Legislative Council;

The cochairs of the Joint Budget Committee;

The Chair of the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation;

The Chair of the House Committee on Revenue and Taxation;

Three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one (1) of whom shall be appointed Cochair of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy; and

Three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one (1) of whom shall be appointed Cochair of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy.

The members shall be entitled to per diem and mileage, at the rates prescribed by law for members of interim committees of the General Assembly, to be paid from funds appropriated for paying per diem and mileage of interim committees.

The Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy shall hear matters relating to the economic and revenue outlook of the state and information relating to the economic and fiscal impact of public policy measures, including the revenue forecasts as submitted by the Governor, and make such recommendations as it deems necessary.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1274, § 2; 1997, No. 1354, § 25; 2001, No. 160, § 1.

10-3-1402. Office of Economic and Tax Policy — Creation.

There is hereby created within the Bureau of Legislative Research the “Office of Economic and Tax Policy”.

The office shall be staffed by such personnel as may be authorized by annual appropriations of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1274, § 1; 2015, No. 1150, § 4.

10-3-1403. Office of Economic and Tax Policy — Powers and duties.

The Office of Economic and Tax Policy shall work under the standards and guidelines of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy and shall:

The office shall prepare fiscal impact analyses of proposed legislation on request of:

Any member of the General Assembly; or

A legislative committee.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1274, § 4; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 1; 2005, No. 1981, § 2.

10-3-1404. Forecast of general revenues.

(1)On or before the third Wednesday in May before the beginning of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall submit to the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy the following forecasts of general revenues to be available under the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.:

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1274, § 3; 2013, No. 1224, § 1;
2017, No. 823, § 1.

10-3-1405. Interdepartmental cooperation and assistance.

The office with such nonconfidential tax information as may be requested by the office; and

Such other assistance to the office as may be requested.

Cooperate with and assist the office in carrying out its duties; and

Provide support and advice to the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy in determining the economic policy and revenue forecast of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1274, § 5; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 2; 2005, No. 1981, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 2211.

Subchapter 15

— Desegregation Litigation — Legislative Oversight

10-3-1501. [Expired.]

10-3-1503. [Expired.]

10-3-1505. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 16

— Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education Reform

10-3-1601. Creation — Members.

To assist the General Assembly, there is established the “Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education Reform” to be composed of the following members:

Seven (7) members of the Senate to be appointed by the Chair of the Senate Committee on Education, in consultation with the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

Seven (7) members of the House of Representatives to be appointed by the Chair of the House Committee on Education, in consultation with the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

In making their appointments, the Chair of the Senate Committee on Education and the Chair of the House Committee on Education shall seek to ensure that members who are knowledgeable about all types of educational issues and who represent all geographic regions of the state shall serve on the Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education Reform.

The Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education Reform shall be assisted by staff provided by the Bureau of Legislative Research.

Members of the Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education Reform shall be entitled to receive per diem and expenses for their attendance at committee meetings at the same rate as members of the General Assembly receive for attendance at meetings of interim committees.

The members appointed to the Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education Reform shall select a Senate cochair and a House cochair, each of whom shall serve for a two-year term during the interim.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 978, § 1; 1993, No. 1272, § 1; 1997, No. 1354, § 27; 1999, No. 1163, § 1.